California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
Sales invoices for pesticides first sold into or within this state shall show that the assessments specified in Sections 12841 and 12841.1 will be paid by the person or entity that first sold the pesticide for use in the state. All other sales invoices for pesticides sold into or within this state, except retail sales of those nonagricultural pesticides labeled only for home, industrial, or institutional use, shall show as a comment on the invoice that the assessment will be paid, and may show an amount or rate that represents the assessment. However, only the person who actually will pay the assessment may show the amount or rate of the assessment as a line item on the sales invoice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 60, Sec. 21.   (AB 2113)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Labeling and Warranty [12851. - 12859.]

12851.

The registrant of any pesticide shall attach to each separate lot, and each separate, finished, sealed, or closed container or package of pesticide that the registrant intends to sell within this state, a plainly printed label, that states all of the following:

(a) The name, brand, or trademark, if any, under which the pesticide is sold.

(b) The name and address of the registered manufacturer, importer, or vendor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12852.

The registrant of any pesticide that is sold or delivered to a consumer in this state shall furnish printed directions for use, and dilution if any, upon the label, or shall enclose the printed directions in each container or package of the pesticide.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12853.

A registrant of pesticides may print upon the label of any sealed or closed container or package of pesticide that the registrant intends to sell within this state, or upon the label of any opened lot from which sales have been authorized by the director, such limitations of warranty with respect to the use of the pesticide, as the registrant may consider proper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12854.

No limitations of warranty by the seller shall exclude or waive either of the following implied warranties:

(a) That the pesticide corresponds to all claims and descriptions that the registrant has made in respect to it in print.

(b) That the pesticide is reasonably fit for use for any purpose for which it is intended according to any printed statement of the registrant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12855.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the registrant is not liable for any injury or damage that is suffered solely by reason of any of the following:

(a) The use of the pesticide for a purpose that is not indicated by the label.

(b) The use of the pesticide contrary to the printed directions of the registrant or seller.

(c) The breach of any warranty by the registrant that is not expressly printed on the label.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 63.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12856.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 12857, a pesticide shall not be sold unless it is in a registrant’s sealed or closed container or package.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 64.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12857.

The director , pursuant to regulations prescribed by him or her, may authorize sales of pesticides to be made out of a registrant’s opened but properly labeled lot, container, or package. The director shall serve notice of the proposed action by depositing a copy of it in a United States post office, inclosed in a sealed envelope with postage prepaid and addressed to each registrant at his or her last address on file with the department. The director shall allow 15 days, during which time any protest may be filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 65.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12858.

The statement of ingredients in any pesticide that is intended and sold for internal administration to animals may be given in terms of dosage in lieu of percentage by weight as required by Article 4 (commencing with Section 12811) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 12881).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12859.

The director shall adopt regulations governing the labeling of service containers. The labeling regulations shall not apply to containers used by a person engaging in the business of farming when the containers are used on the property that the person is farming. The regulations shall provide that the labeling only include the following:

(a) The name and address of the person or firm responsible for the container.

(b) The identity of the pesticide in the container.

(c) The word “DANGER”, “WARNING”, or “CAUTION” in accordance with the label on the original container.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Misbranding [12881. - 12885.]

12881.

A pesticide is misbranded in any of the following cases:

(a) The package or label bears any false or misleading statement, design, or device regarding the article or any ingredient or substance that is contained in it.

(b) The package or label is falsely branded as to the place of manufacture or production of the pesticide.

(c) It is an imitation of, or offered for sale under the name of, another article.

(d) It is labeled or branded so as to deceive or mislead the purchaser.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12882.

A pesticide is also misbranded in any of the following cases:

(a) The contents of the package as originally put up have been removed in whole or in part and other contents placed in the package.

(b) The contents of the package are of a quality below that of the guarantee on the label, on the application for registration of the pesticide, or of the analysis of the representative sample delivered in connection with the application for registration of the pesticide.

(c) If the contents of any package of a pesticide is stated in terms of weight or measure, and the weight or measure is not plainly and correctly stated on the outside of the package.

(d) The label does not conform to the registered label approved by the director under the standards of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12883.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 12884 , a pesticide is also misbranded when the label fails to state one of the following:

(a) The name and percentage of each active ingredient, together with the total percentage of the inert ingredients, in the pesticide.

(b) The name of each active ingredient, together with the name of each and the total percentage of the inert ingredients, if there are any, in the pesticide.

A pesticide that is sold only as a spray adjuvant is not misbranded if the total percentage of the constituents ineffective as a spray adjuvant is stated on the label without mention of the terms “active ingredient” or “inert ingredient” in lieu of one of the options required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12884.

If the preparation is highly toxic to humans, as determined by regulations of the director, a pesticide is misbranded if the label fails to state the name and percentage of each active ingredient together with the total percentage of the inert ingredients in the pesticide.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 71.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12885.

In addition to the other provisions of this article, a spray adjuvant is misbranded if the label fails to state the type or function and the names of the principal functioning agents. If more than three functioning agents are present, only the three principal ones need be named.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Adulteration [12911. - 12911.]

12911.

A pesticide is adulterated in any of the following cases:

(a) Its strength or purity falls below the standard or quality that it is represented to have.

(b) Any ingredient that is necessary to its effectiveness has been wholly or in part abstracted or omitted in its manufacture, or other materials substituted for that ingredient.

(c) It is intended for use on vegetation and contains any substance that is seriously injurious to vegetation, except weeds, if used according to the directions that are furnished with it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 72.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Analysis [12931. - 12931.]

12931.

The director may take samples of pesticides, make analyses or examinations of them, and make such investigations as are necessary for the full enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 695, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Seizure [12961. - 12961.]

12961.

The director may seize and quarantine any pesticide that is adulterated, misbranded, or detrimental to agriculture or to the public health, or which is otherwise not in conformity with any provision of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 75.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Recommendations and Usage [12971. - 12979.]

12971.

No recommendation shall be in conflict with the registered labeling for the product being recommended.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12972 by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1049.)
-------------------------------------------

12972.

The use of any pesticide by any person shall be in such a manner as to prevent substantial drift to nontarget areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1049.)
-------------------------------------------

12973.

The use of any pesticide shall not conflict with labeling registered pursuant to this chapter which is delivered with the pesticide or with any additional limitations applicable to the conditions of any permit issued by the director or commissioner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1049.)
-------------------------------------------

12974.

Failure of a person using a pesticide to possess a written recommendation shall create a rebuttable presumption that he or she has assumed responsibility for the recommendation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1476, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12975.

A person making a written recommendation does not incur an obligation to insure that the actual use follows his or her recommendation.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12978 by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1049.)
-------------------------------------------

12976.

The director may adopt regulations to govern the possession, sale, or use of any pesticide which the director finds necessary to carry out the purposes of Division 6 (commencing with Section 11401) or this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 806, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12977.

The director, and the commissioner of each county under the direction and supervision of the director, shall enforce the provisions of this article and the regulations adopted pursuant to it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1049.)
-------------------------------------------

12978.

Pesticide applications on public property which take place on school grounds, parks, or other public rights-of-way where public exposure is foreseeable shall be posted with warning signs. The signs shall be in English and Spanish and shall contain a warning that the area has been treated with a pesticide and that individuals are not to enter the area.

(a) This section shall apply to all pesticide applications which have worker reentry intervals of at least 24 hours.

(b) Posting shall be accomplished immediately prior to pesticide applications, and the signs shall be removed within 24 hours after the expiration of the reentry interval.

(c) Signs shall be posted at regular intervals and at all regular points of public entry.

(d) The agency with responsibility for the property where the pesticide application is to take place shall post the warnings required by this section.

(e) The responsible agency may substitute a barrier for the warning signs to exclude public exposure to a treated area.

(f) This section does not apply to pesticide applications by the Department of Transportation on public highway rights-of-way.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 840, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12978.7.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Chlorophacinone” means a pesticide product containing chlorophacinone.

(2) “Diphacinone” means a pesticide product containing diphacinone.

(3) “First-generation anticoagulant rodenticide” means a pesticide product containing any of the following active ingredients:

(A) Diphacinone.

(B) Chlorophacinone.

(C) Warfarin.

(4) “Integrated pest management” has the same meaning as defined in Section 11401.7.

(5) “Second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide” means a pesticide product containing any of the following active ingredients:

(A) Brodifacoum.

(B) Bromadiolone.

(C) Difenacoum.

(D) Difethialone.

(6) “Sustainable pest management” has the same meaning as defined in Section 11412.

(7) “Warfarin” means a pesticide product containing warfarin.

(8) “Wildlife
 habitat area” means a park or wildlife refuge managed by a state agency, regional government, or quasi-government agency, or by a special district.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (g), and notwithstanding subdivisions (c), (d), and (e), the use of a second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide or first-generation anticoagulant rodenticide is prohibited in a wildlife habitat area.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (g) or (h), the use of a second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide is prohibited in this state until the director makes the certification described in subdivision (i).

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (g) or (h), the use of diphacinone is prohibited in this state and diphacinone shall be considered a restricted material pursuant to Section 14004.5 until the director makes the certification
 described in subdivision (j).

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (g) or (h), the use of chlorophacinone or warfarin is prohibited in this state and chlorophacinone and warfarin shall be considered restricted materials pursuant to Section 14004.5. The director may suspend the prohibition if the director makes the certification described in subdivision (k). Nothing in this subdivision or subdivision (k) requires the department to suspend the prohibition on chlorophacinone or warfarin described in this subdivision, complete a reevaluation of chlorophacinone or warfarin, or adopt any additional restrictions on chlorophacinone or warfarin.

(f) State agencies are directed to encourage federal agencies to comply with subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive.

(g) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) The use of a second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide or first-generation anticoagulant rodenticide by a governmental agency employee who complies with Section 106925 of the Health and Safety Code, who uses a second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide or first-generation anticoagulant rodenticide for public health activities.

(2) The use of a second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide or first-generation anticoagulant rodenticide otherwise prohibited by this section when used by an employee or contractor of a governmental agency or public utility, as defined in Section 216 of the Public Utilities Code, for purposes of protecting water supply and hydroelectric energy generating infrastructure and facilities in a manner that is consistent with all otherwise applicable federal and state laws and regulations.

(3) The use of a second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide or first-generation anticoagulant rodenticide by a mosquito or vector control district formed under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 3 or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Health and Safety Code to protect the public health.

(4) The use of a second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide or first-generation anticoagulant rodenticide for the eradication of nonnative invasive species inhabiting or found to be present on offshore islands in a manner that is consistent with all otherwise applicable federal and state laws and regulations.

(5) The use of a second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide or first-generation anticoagulant rodenticide that the Department of Fish and Wildlife determines is required to control or eradicate an invasive rodent population for the
 protection of threatened or endangered species or their habitats.

(6) The use of a second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide or first-generation anticoagulant rodenticide to control an actual or potential rodent infestation associated with a public health need, as determined by a supporting declaration from the State Public Health Officer or a local public health officer. For purposes of this section, a public health need is an urgent, nonroutine situation posing a significant risk to human health in which it is documented that other rodent control alternatives, including nonchemical alternatives, are inadequate to control the rodent infestation.

(7) The use of a second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide or first-generation anticoagulant rodenticide for research that the department funds, pursuant to Section 6025.5, to protect the food system and the environment.

(8) The use of a second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide or first-generation anticoagulant rodenticide for research purposes related to the reevaluation described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (i), paragraph (1) of subdivision (j), or paragraph (1) of subdivision (k). Before using a second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide or first-generation anticoagulant rodenticide in the manner described in this paragraph, a written authorization for research shall be obtained from the director. The director may specify the conditions in the authorization for research under which the research shall be conducted. The director may terminate, amend, or refuse to issue an authorization for research if the director determines any of the following:

(A) The research may involve a hazard to the environment.

(B) The research may be
 used for purposes unrelated to pesticide data development.

(C) A violation of the authorization for research, prior authorization for research, or Division 6 (commencing with Section 11401) or this division, or a regulation adopted pursuant to either or both of those divisions, has occurred in connection with the research.

(h) (1) This section does not apply to the use of a second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide or first-generation anticoagulant rodenticide in either of the following locations:

(A) A medical waste generator, as defined in Section 117705 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) A facility registered annually and subject to inspection under Section 510 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 360 et
 seq.) and compliant with the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.).

(2) The prohibitions in subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) do not apply to the use of a second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide or first-generation anticoagulant rodenticide for agricultural activities, as defined in Section 564.

(3) For purposes of paragraph (2), “agricultural activities” include activities conducted in any of the following locations:

(A) A warehouse used to store foods for human or animal consumption.

(B) An agricultural food production site, including, but not limited to, a slaughterhouse or cannery.

(C) A factory, brewery, or winery.

(D) An agricultural production site housing water storage and conveyance facilities.

(E) An agricultural production site housing rights-of-way and other transportation infrastructure.

(i) After the director determines that both of the following conditions have occurred, the director shall certify to the Secretary of State that determination:

(1) The department has completed the reevaluation of second-generation anticoagulant rodenticides, as commenced by the department on March 12, 2019, pursuant to California Notice 2019-03 (“Notice of Final Decision to Begin Reevaluation of Second-Generation Anticoagulant Rodenticides”).

(2) Consistent with the requirements of this division and regulations
 adopted pursuant to this division, the department, in consultation with, and with the concurrence of, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, has adopted any additional restrictions that are necessary to ensure a trend of statistically significant reductions in the percentage of wildlife exposed or mean concentration values of detectable levels of second-generation anticoagulant rodenticides or any of their metabolites in tested tissues of a scientifically representative sample of wildlife. These restrictions shall include a requirement to implement sustainable pest management and integrated pest management practices, such as biological control, habitat manipulation, and modification of cultural practices, before the use of second-generation anticoagulant rodenticides. The department, in concurrence with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, shall make a finding that the restrictions are necessary based on the best available science, which may include reviewing data and studying samples of certain species and
 their populations as proxies for all potentially impacted species and populations.

(j) After the director determines that both of the following conditions have occurred, the director shall certify to the Secretary of State that determination:

(1) The department has completed any pending reevaluation of diphacinone.

(2) Consistent with the requirements of this division and regulations adopted pursuant to this division, the department, in consultation with, and with the concurrence of, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, has adopted any additional restrictions that are necessary to ensure a trend of statistically significant reductions in the percentage of wildlife exposed or mean concentration values of detectable levels of diphacinone or any of its metabolites in tested tissues of a scientifically representative
 sample of wildlife. These restrictions shall include a requirement to implement sustainable pest management and integrated pest management practices, such as biological control, habitat manipulation, and modification of cultural practices, before the use of diphacinone. The department, in concurrence with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, shall make a finding that the restrictions are necessary based upon the best available science, which may include reviewing data and studying samples of certain species and their populations as proxies for all potentially impacted species and populations. Substantial evidence supporting the restrictions, including any requirement to implement alternatives, shall, to the extent feasible, include, but not be limited to, analysis regarding exposure pathways, sublethal effects, species sensitivity, and the cumulative and synergistic effects of exposure to anticoagulant rodenticides, including lethal and sublethal effects on wildlife, including rare, sensitive, special
 status, threatened, or endangered species.

(k) If the director determines that both of the following conditions have occurred, the director shall certify to the Secretary of State that determination:

(1) The department has completed a reevaluation of chlorophacinone or warfarin, respectively.

(2) Consistent with the requirements of this division and regulations adopted pursuant to this division, the department, in consultation with, and with the concurrence of, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, has adopted any additional restrictions necessary to ensure a trend of statistically significant reductions in the percentage of wildlife exposed or mean concentration values of detectable levels of chlorophacinone or warfarin, respectively, or any of their metabolites, in tested tissues of a scientifically representative
 sample of wildlife. These restrictions shall include a requirement to implement sustainable pest management and integrated pest management practices, such as biological control, habitat manipulation, and modification of cultural practices, before the use of chlorophacinone or warfarin, respectively. The department, in concurrence with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, shall make a finding that the restrictions are necessary based on the best available science, which may include reviewing data and studying samples of certain species and their populations as proxies for all potentially impacted species and populations. Substantial evidence supporting the restrictions, including any requirement to implement alternatives, shall, to the extent feasible, include, but not be limited to, analysis regarding exposure pathways, sublethal effects, species sensitivity, and the cumulative and synergistic effects of exposure to anticoagulant rodenticides, including lethal and sublethal effects on wildlife, including
 rare, sensitive, special status, threatened, or endangered species.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 2552)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

12979.

A pesticide use report shall be submitted to the commissioner or director on a form and in a manner prescribed by the director. The data from the pesticide use reports shall be considered in setting priorities for food monitoring, pesticide use enforcement, farm worker safety programs, environmental monitoring, pest control research, public health monitoring and research, and similar activities by the department, or by the department in cooperation with other state, regional, or local agencies with appropriate authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1200, Sec. 7.   Effective October 1, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.5. Pesticides and Worker Safety [12980. - 12988.]

12980.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that it is necessary and desirable to provide for the safe use of pesticides and for safe working conditions for farmworkers, pest control applicators, and other persons handling, storing, or applying pesticides, or working in and about pesticide-treated areas.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the development of regulations relating to pesticides and worker safety should be the joint and mutual responsibility of the Department of Food and Agriculture and the State Department of Health Services.

The Legislature further finds and declares that in carrying out the provisions of this article, the University of California, the Department of Industrial Relations, and any other similar institution or agency should be consulted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

12981.

The director shall adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this article. Such regulations shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following subjects:

(a) Restricting worker reentry into areas treated with pesticides determined by the director to be hazardous to worker safety by using either or both of the following:

(1) Time limits.

(2) Pesticide residue levels on treated plant parts determined by scientific analysis to not be a significant factor in cholinesterase depression or other health effects.

When the director has adopted regulations pursuant to both paragraphs (1) and (2), the person in control of the area treated with the pesticide shall have the option of following regulations adopted pursuant to either paragraph (1) or (2). If the person in control of the area treated with the pesticide chooses to follow regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (2), the director may establish and charge the person a fee necessary to cover any costs of analysis or costs incurred by the director or commissioner in carrying out regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (2). The regulations shall include a procedure for the collection of the fee, and the fee shall not exceed actual cost.

(b) Handling of pesticides.

(c) Hand washing facilities.

(d) Farm storage and commercial warehousing of pesticides.

(e) Protective devices, including, but not limited to, respirators and eyeglasses.

(f) Posting, in English and Spanish, of fields, areas, adjacent areas or fields, or storage areas.

The State Department of Health Services shall participate in the development of any regulations adopted pursuant to this article. Such regulations that relate to health effects shall be based upon the recommendations of the State Department of Health Services. The original written recommendations of the State Department of Health Services, any subsequent revisions of those recommendations, and the supporting evidence and data upon which the recommendations were based shall be made available upon request to any person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 926.   Effective September 18, 1980.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

12982.

The director and the commissioner of each county under the direction and supervision of the director, shall enforce the provisions of this article and the regulations adopted pursuant to it. The local health officer may assist the director and the commissioner in the enforcement of the provisions of this article and any regulations adopted pursuant to it. The local health officer shall investigate any condition where a health hazard from pesticide use exists, and shall take necessary action, in cooperation with the commissioner, to abate the condition. The local health officer may call upon the State Department of Health Services for assistance pursuant to Section 105210 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 53.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12985.

Any person who orders an employee to enter an area posted with a warning sign in violation of any worker safety reentry requirements promulgated pursuant to this article by the director is guilty of a misdemeanor. A violation of this article affecting any worker or workers constitutes a separate offense for each affected worker.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 840, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12986.

(a) The director shall approve programs for training persons who handle or apply pesticides in aerial pest control operations. The training programs shall be consistent with, but not limited to, this article and may include participation by trainees in field practices or exercises dealing with the safe handling and application of pesticides and may include performance measurement of the practices and exercises.

(b) The approved training programs shall be conducted by industry qualified instructors. Industry qualified instructors are persons approved by the director.

(c) All persons who successfully complete an approved training program shall be issued a certificate of completion by industry qualified instructors, which shall be available for inspection by the director or a commissioner, or his or her representative. When the person completing an approved training program attended the program at the request or expense of the person’s employer, the employer shall be provided a copy of the certificate of completion, which also shall be available for inspection by the director or a commissioner, or his or her representative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 746, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12987.

The director shall require registrants of pesticides to submit the data necessary to perform the director’s duties under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 274, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12988.

No pesticide may be registered or reregistered unless the director determines that the registrant has complied with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 274, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Violations [12991. - 12995.]

12991.

It is unlawful for any person, individually or through another, in connection with any substance or mixture of substances included within the scope of this chapter, to do any of the following:

(a) Make any material or substantial misrepresentation.

(b) Make any false promises of a character likely to influence, induce, or deceive.

(c) Engage in illegitimate business or dishonest dealing.

(d) Cause to be published or distributed any false or misleading literature, or cause to be displayed any false or misleading advertisement.

(e) Use, store, transport, handle, or dispose of any pesticide, or of any container that holds or has held a pesticide, except in compliance with regulations of the director.

(f) Purchase for use in this state a pesticide that is labeled for agricultural use except from a person licensed as a pest control dealer pursuant to Section 12107. Persons using those products shall retain receipts of the purchase of the products for four years and make the receipts available for inspection upon request of the director or the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 695, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12992.

It is unlawful for any person to sell any adulterated or misbranded pesticide.

In any prosecution of any agent or dealer under this section it is a complete defense to prove that the adulterated or misbranded pesticide that is the basis of the prosecution was guaranteed by the party from whom the agent or dealer purchased it to be not adulterated or misbranded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 77.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12993.

It is unlawful for any person to manufacture, deliver, or sell any pesticide or any substance or mixture of substances that is represented to be a pesticide, or to retail any formula for a pesticide in conjunction with the sale or gift of materials that are represented to be the essential ingredients necessary to constitute a pesticide, which is not registered pursuant to this chapter, or for which the registration has been suspended or canceled, except as provided in regulations adopted by the director or as provided in the notice or order of suspension or cancellation. This section, however, does not apply to any pesticide product of a registrant that is manufactured solely for export outside this state, and which is so exported.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 78.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12994.

It is unlawful for any person to transport, destroy, or dispose of any quarantined pesticide, unless the person has received written permission from the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 79.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12995.

Except as provided in regulations adopted by the director or as provided in the notice or order of suspension or cancellation, it is unlawful for any person, by himself or herself or through another, to possess or use any pesticide that is not registered pursuant to this chapter, or for which registration has been suspended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 80.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Penalties and Injunctive Relief [12996. - 13001.]

12996.

(a) Every person who violates any provision of this division relating to pesticides, or any regulation issued pursuant to a provision of this division relating to pesticides, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by imprisonment of not more than six months, or
 by both the fine and imprisonment. Upon a second or subsequent conviction of the same provision of this division relating to pesticides, a person shall be punished by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) nor more than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), or by imprisonment of not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment. Each violation constitutes a separate offense.

(b) Notwithstanding the penalties prescribed in subdivision (a), if the offense involves an
 intentional or negligent violation that created or reasonably could have created a hazard to human health or the environment, the convicted person shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or in the state prison or by a fine of not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) nor more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(c) This section does not apply to violations of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 15300) or Section
 13186.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 574, Sec. 4.   (AB 211)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12996.5.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter:

(1) “Office” means the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment.

(2) “Department” means the Department of Pesticide Regulation.

(3) “Certified Unified Program Agency” or “CUPA” means the agency certified by the Secretary for Environmental Protection to implement the unified program specified in Chapter 6.11 (commencing with Section 25404) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code within a jurisdiction.

(4) “Agency” means the California Environmental Protection Agency.

(5) “Nonoccupational” means that the person exposed to the pesticide was not at the time of the exposure performing work as an employee.

(6) “Acute” means a medical condition that involves a sudden onset of symptoms due to an illness, injury, or other medical problem that requires prompt medical attention and that has a limited duration.

(7) “Uncompensated medical care” means the cost of care not covered by any other program, including, but not limited to copayments for medical insurance, Healthy Families Program, or Medi-Cal. Reimbursed medical costs shall not exceed 125 percent of the Medi-Cal reimbursement rates.

(b) The exposure of each person to a pesticide resulting from the violation of Section 12972 or 12973, or any regulation adopted pursuant to Section 12976, 12981, or 14005, that causes acute illnesses or injury, shall constitute a separate violation of the statute or regulation.
